Illinois, session 104th, SB1759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $50,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund 6to the Department of Transportation for the expansion of Route 76 from Brisbin Road to Ridge Road. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.